Utah statutes.
34-29-6.   Referring employment to unlawful places -- Penalty.

Any employment agent who knowingly refers employment to any place of bad repute, house of ill fame, assignation house, or to any house or place of amusement kept for immoral purposes, is guilty of a misdemeanor.  In addition to any other penalty, the agent's license shall be revoked.

